District of Columbia statutes.
22-2306

Disclosure.

Any arrest or conviction under this chapter shall be disclosed to public and private social service agencies that request the Metropolitan Police Department or the court to be notified of such events.

Nov. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 10-54, § 7, 40 DCR 5450
1981 Ed., § 22-3316.